language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/dsb-lower-sorbian/lower_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_2016_catalog_bvs_hunspell_package_wiki_retry__dsb-DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 241 Y 18
SFX 241 0 ch .
SFX 241 0 chmej .
SFX 241 0 chmy .
SFX 241 0 chu .
SFX 241 0 j .
SFX 241 0 jmej .
SFX 241 0 jmy .
SFX 241 0 jtej .
SFX 241 0 jśo .
SFX 241 0 m .
SFX 241 0 mej .
SFX 241 0 my .
SFX 241 0 tej .
SFX 241 0 śo .
SFX 241 0 š .
SFX 241 0 šo .
SFX 241 0 štej .
SFX 241 0 šćo .
SFX 242 Y 11
SFX 242 0 e .
SFX 242 0 ej .
SFX 242 0 eje .
SFX 242 0 eju .
SFX 242 0 en .
SFX 242 0 o .
SFX 242 0 og .
SFX 242 0 ogo .
SFX 242 0 om .
SFX 242 0 omu .
SFX 242 0 u .
SFX 243 Y 7
SFX 243 0 ich .
SFX 243 0 im .
SFX 243 0 imi .
SFX 243 0 o .
SFX 243 0 och .
SFX 243 0 om .
SFX 243 0 omi .
SFX 244 Y 7
SFX 244 0 ich .
SFX 244 0 im .
SFX 244 0 imi .
SFX 244 0 o .
SFX 244 0 och .
SFX 244 0 om .
SFX 244 0 omi .
SFX 245 Y 8
SFX 245 0 a .
SFX 245 0 ich .
SFX 245 0 im .
SFX 245 0 imi .
SFX 245 0 o .
SFX 245 0 och .
SFX 245 0 om .
SFX 245 0 omi .
SFX 246 Y 8
SFX 246 0 i .
SFX 246 0 ich .
SFX 246 0 im .
SFX 246 0 imi .
SFX 246 0 o .
SFX 246 0 och .
SFX 246 0 om .
SFX 246 0 omi .
SFX 247 Y 8
SFX 247 0 e .
SFX 247 0 ich .
SFX 247 0 im .
SFX 247 0 imi .
SFX 247 0 o .
SFX 247 0 och .
SFX 247 0 om .
SFX 247 0 omi .
SFX 248 Y 38
SFX 248 0 a .
SFX 248 0 ach .
SFX 248 0 achmej .
SFX 248 0 achmy .
SFX 248 0 achu .
SFX 248 0 am .
SFX 248 0 ami .
SFX 248 0 ašo .
SFX 248 0 aštej .
SFX 248 0 ašćo .
SFX 248 0 e .
SFX 248 0 eg .
SFX 248 0 ego .
SFX 248 0 ej .
SFX 248 0 eje .
SFX 248 0 eju .
SFX 248 0 em .
SFX 248 0 emu .
SFX 248 0 mej .
SFX 248 0 my .
SFX 248 0 oju .
SFX 248 0 om .
SFX 248 0 oma .
SFX 248 0 ow .
SFX 248 0 owu .
SFX 248 0 tej .
SFX 248 0 u .
SFX 248 0 y .
SFX 248 0 ych .
SFX 248 0 ym .
SFX 248 0 yma .
SFX 248 0 ymej .
SFX 248 0 ymi .
SFX 248 0 ymy .
SFX 248 0 ytej .
SFX 248 0 yśo .
SFX 248 0 yš .
SFX 248 0 ćo .
SFX 249 Y 9
SFX 249 0 ach .
SFX 249 0 am .
SFX 249 0 ami .
SFX 249 0 mej .
SFX 249 0 my .
SFX 249 0 ow .
SFX 249 0 tej .
SFX 249 0 y .
SFX 249 0 śo .
SFX 250 Y 26
SFX 250 0 e .
SFX 250 0 ech .
SFX 250 0 echmej .
SFX 250 0 echmy .
SFX 250 0 echu .
SFX 250 0 eštej .
SFX 250 0 ešćo .
SFX 250 0 ijo .
SFX 250 0 ijom .
SFX 250 0 ijomej .
SFX 250 0 ijomy .
SFX 250 0 ijotej .
SFX 250 0 ijośo .
SFX 250 0 ijoš .
SFX 250 0 iju .
SFX 250 0 mej .
SFX 250 0 my .
SFX 250 0 o .
SFX 250 0 om .
SFX 250 0 omej .
SFX 250 0 omy .
SFX 250 0 otej .
SFX 250 0 ośo .
SFX 250 0 oš .
SFX 250 0 tej .
SFX 250 0 ćo .
SFX 251 Y 7
SFX 251 0 ach .
SFX 251 0 am .
SFX 251 0 ow .
SFX 251 0 owu .
SFX 251 0 y .
SFX 251 0 yma .
SFX 251 0 ymi .
SFX 252 Y 7
SFX 252 0 ach .
SFX 252 0 am .
SFX 252 0 ow .
SFX 252 0 owu .
SFX 252 0 y .
SFX 252 0 yma .
SFX 252 0 ymi .
SFX 253 Y 10
SFX 253 0 i .
SFX 253 0 ijo .
SFX 253 0 ijom .
SFX 253 0 ijomej .
SFX 253 0 ijomy .
SFX 253 0 ijotej .
SFX 253 0 ijośo .
SFX 253 0 ijoš .
SFX 253 0 iju .
SFX 253 0 im .
SFX 254 Y 25
SFX 254 0 a .
SFX 254 0 ach .
SFX 254 0 achmej .
SFX 254 0 achmy .
SFX 254 0 achu .
SFX 254 0 am .
SFX 254 0 ami .
SFX 254 0 ašo .
SFX 254 0 aštej .
SFX 254 0 ašćo .
SFX 254 0 e .
SFX 254 0 i .
SFX 254 0 im .
SFX 254 0 imej .
SFX 254 0 imy .
SFX 254 0 itej .
SFX 254 0 iśo .
SFX 254 0 iš .
SFX 254 0 o .
SFX 254 0 oju .
SFX 254 0 om .
SFX 254 0 oma .
SFX 254 0 ow .
SFX 254 0 owu .
SFX 254 0 u .
SFX 255 Y 24
SFX 255 0 a .
SFX 255 0 ach .
SFX 255 0 achmej .
SFX 255 0 achmy .
SFX 255 0 achu .
SFX 255 0 am .
SFX 255 0 ami .
SFX 255 0 ašo .
SFX 255 0 aštej .
SFX 255 0 ašćo .
SFX 255 0 e .
SFX 255 0 i .
SFX 255 0 im .
SFX 255 0 imej .
SFX 255 0 imy .
SFX 255 0 itej .
SFX 255 0 iśo .
SFX 255 0 iš .
SFX 255 0 oju .
SFX 255 0 om .
SFX 255 0 oma .
SFX 255 0 ow .
SFX 255 0 owu .
SFX 255 0 u .
SFX 256 Y 5
SFX 256 0 j .
SFX 256 0 jmej .
SFX 256 0 jmy .
SFX 256 0 jtej .
SFX 256 0 jśo .
SFX 257 Y 5
SFX 257 0 j .
SFX 257 0 jmej .
SFX 257 0 jmy .
SFX 257 0 jtej .
SFX 257 0 jśo .
SFX 258 Y 27
SFX 258 0 ach .
SFX 258 0 achmej .
SFX 258 0 achmy .
SFX 258 0 achu .
SFX 258 0 ašo .
SFX 258 0 aštej .
SFX 258 0 ašćo .
SFX 258 0 e .
SFX 258 0 mej .
SFX 258 0 my .
SFX 258 0 tej .
SFX 258 0 y .
SFX 258 0 yjo .
SFX 258 0 yjom .
SFX 258 0 yjomej .
SFX 258 0 yjomy .
SFX 258 0 yjotej .
SFX 258 0 yjośo .
SFX 258 0 yjoš .
SFX 258 0 yju .
SFX 258 0 ym .
SFX 258 0 ymej .
SFX 258 0 ymy .
SFX 258 0 ytej .
SFX 258 0 yśo .
SFX 258 0 yš .
SFX 258 0 ćo .
SFX 259 Y 23
SFX 259 0 a .
SFX 259 0 ach .
SFX 259 0 am .
SFX 259 0 ami .
SFX 259 0 ch .
SFX 259 0 chmej .
SFX 259 0 chmy .
SFX 259 0 chu .
SFX 259 0 e .
SFX 259 0 m .
SFX 259 0 mej .
SFX 259 0 my .
SFX 259 0 oju .
SFX 259 0 om .
SFX 259 0 oma .
SFX 259 0 ow .
SFX 259 0 owu .
SFX 259 0 tej .
SFX 259 0 u .
SFX 259 0 śo .
SFX 259 0 š .
SFX 259 0 štej .
SFX 259 0 šćo .
SFX 260 Y 21
SFX 260 0 a .
SFX 260 0 ach .
SFX 260 0 am .
SFX 260 0 ami .
SFX 260 0 e .
SFX 260 0 o .
SFX 260 0 om .
SFX 260 0 oma .
SFX 260 0 omej .
SFX 260 0 omy .
SFX 260 0 otej .
SFX 260 0 ow .
SFX 260 0 owu .
SFX 260 0 ośo .
SFX 260 0 oš .
SFX 260 0 u .
SFX 260 0 y .
SFX 260 0 ymej .
SFX 260 0 ymy .
SFX 260 0 ytej .
SFX 260 0 yśo .
SFX 261 Y 21
SFX 261 0 a .
SFX 261 0 ach .
SFX 261 0 am .
SFX 261 0 ami .
SFX 261 0 e .
SFX 261 0 mej .
SFX 261 0 my .
SFX 261 0 o .
SFX 261 0 oju .
SFX 261 0 om .
SFX 261 0 oma .
SFX 261 0 omej .
SFX 261 0 omy .
SFX 261 0 otej .
SFX 261 0 ow .
SFX 261 0 owu .
SFX 261 0 ośo .
SFX 261 0 oš .
SFX 261 0 tej .
SFX 261 0 u .
SFX 261 0 ćo .
SFX 262 Y 22
SFX 262 0 a .
SFX 262 0 ach .
SFX 262 0 am .
SFX 262 0 ami .
SFX 262 0 e .
SFX 262 0 i .
SFX 262 0 mej .
SFX 262 0 my .
SFX 262 0 o .
SFX 262 0 oju .
SFX 262 0 om .
SFX 262 0 oma .
SFX 262 0 omej .
SFX 262 0 omy .
SFX 262 0 otej .
SFX 262 0 ow .
SFX 262 0 owu .
SFX 262 0 ośo .
SFX 262 0 oš .
SFX 262 0 tej .
SFX 262 0 u .
SFX 262 0 śo .
SFX 263 Y 13
SFX 263 0 e .
SFX 263 0 mej .
SFX 263 0 my .
SFX 263 0 tej .
SFX 263 0 yjo .
SFX 263 0 yjom .
SFX 263 0 yjomej .
SFX 263 0 yjomy .
SFX 263 0 yjotej .
SFX 263 0 yjośo .
SFX 263 0 yjoš .
SFX 263 0 yju .
SFX 263 0 ćo .
SFX 264 Y 12
SFX 264 0 mej .
SFX 264 0 my .
SFX 264 0 tej .
SFX 264 0 yjo .
SFX 264 0 yjom .
SFX 264 0 yjomej .
SFX 264 0 yjomy .
SFX 264 0 yjotej .
SFX 264 0 yjośo .
SFX 264 0 yjoš .
SFX 264 0 yju .
SFX 264 0 ćo .
SFX 265 Y 23
SFX 265 0 ach .
SFX 265 0 achmej .
SFX 265 0 achmy .
SFX 265 0 achu .
SFX 265 0 ašo .
SFX 265 0 aštej .
SFX 265 0 ašćo .
SFX 265 0 e .
SFX 265 0 mej .
SFX 265 0 my .
SFX 265 0 og .
SFX 265 0 ogo .
SFX 265 0 om .
SFX 265 0 omu .
SFX 265 0 tej .
SFX 265 0 y .
SFX 265 0 ym .
SFX 265 0 ymej .
SFX 265 0 ymy .
SFX 265 0 ytej .
SFX 265 0 yśo .
SFX 265 0 yš .
SFX 265 0 ćo .
SFX 266 Y 8
SFX 266 0 i .
SFX 266 0 im .
SFX 266 0 imej .
SFX 266 0 imi .
SFX 266 0 imy .
SFX 266 0 itej .
SFX 266 0 iśo .
SFX 266 0 iš .
SFX 267 Y 9
SFX 267 0 i .
SFX 267 0 iju .
SFX 267 0 im .
SFX 267 0 imej .
SFX 267 0 imy .
SFX 267 0 itej .
SFX 267 0 iśo .
SFX 267 0 iš .
SFX 267 0 ě .
SFX 268 Y 10
SFX 268 0 a .
SFX 268 0 e .
SFX 268 0 ej .
SFX 268 0 eje .
SFX 268 0 eju .
SFX 268 0 ich .
SFX 268 0 im .
SFX 268 0 ima .
SFX 268 0 imi .
SFX 268 0 u .
SFX 269 Y 9
SFX 269 0 a .
SFX 269 0 ach .
SFX 269 0 am .
SFX 269 0 ami .
SFX 269 0 eju .
SFX 269 0 oma .
SFX 269 0 ow .
SFX 269 0 owu .
SFX 269 0 u .
SFX 270 Y 10
SFX 270 0 a .
SFX 270 0 ach .
SFX 270 0 am .
SFX 270 0 ami .
SFX 270 0 e .
SFX 270 0 eju .
SFX 270 0 oma .
SFX 270 0 ow .
SFX 270 0 owu .
SFX 270 0 u .
SFX 271 Y 12
SFX 271 0 a .
SFX 271 0 ach .
SFX 271 0 am .
SFX 271 0 ami .
SFX 271 0 e .
SFX 271 0 eju .
SFX 271 0 i .
SFX 271 0 im .
SFX 271 0 oma .
SFX 271 0 ow .
SFX 271 0 owu .
SFX 271 0 u .
SFX 272 Y 12
SFX 272 0 a .
SFX 272 0 ach .
SFX 272 0 am .
SFX 272 0 ami .
SFX 272 0 e .
SFX 272 0 eju .
SFX 272 0 i .
SFX 272 0 im .
SFX 272 0 oma .
SFX 272 0 ow .
SFX 272 0 owu .
SFX 272 0 u .
SFX 273 Y 11
SFX 273 0 a .
SFX 273 0 ach .
SFX 273 0 am .
SFX 273 0 ami .
SFX 273 0 e .
SFX 273 0 eju .
SFX 273 0 om .
SFX 273 0 oma .
SFX 273 0 ow .
SFX 273 0 owu .
SFX 273 0 u .
SFX 274 Y 12
SFX 274 0 a .
SFX 274 0 ach .
SFX 274 0 am .
SFX 274 0 ami .
SFX 274 0 e .
SFX 274 0 eju .
SFX 274 0 i .
SFX 274 0 om .
SFX 274 0 oma .
SFX 274 0 ow .
SFX 274 0 owu .
SFX 274 0 u .
