language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/dsb-lower-sorbian/lower_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_2016_catalog_bvs_hunspell_package_wiki_retry__dsb-DE.dic
Azisk/1,268
Bemsk/1,268
Brjošć/1,268
Cewkarj/1,273
Chinsk/1,268
Elsass-Lothringsk/1,268
Franksk/1,268
Grönlandsk/1,268
Górnołužycanarj/1,273
Illyrsk/1,268
Jordanisk/1,268
Katalonisk/1,268
Kočmarj/1,273
Mauretańsk/1,268
Mejstarj/1,273
Norwegsk/1,268
Póstarj/1,273
Płomjenj/1,269
Rusopólsk/1,268
Thailandarj/1,273
Tibetańsk/1,268
abstinenclarj/1,273
alfapromjenj/1,269
baj/262
brěmjenj/1,269
charchl/1,255
chrjachl/1,254
chruchl/1,254
chytarj/1,273
de-facto-pśipóznaś/1,271
deltapromjenj/1,269
domagraś/1,271
dozakazu/1,256
došyś/272
duša/241
dwaadwaźasć/1,245
dwanasć/1,243
dwaźasć/1,245
final/1,271
gammapromjenj/1,269
gnerl/1,254
gnu/257
gregl/1,254
gromadu/257
gužl/1,254
głowuwiś/1,271
hympl/1,254
iglu/257
jadenadwaźasć/1,245
jadnasć/1,243
jadnozłožkarj/1,273
juchu/257
judaizěrowanj/1,270
k-dispoziciji-měś/1,271
kašl/1,254
keźbu/257
koeksistěru/1,256
kowal/274
kradu/257
kuš/248
kwazl/1,254
kórtygraś/1,271
kšajźu/257
lika/241
mroc/258
mudrostarj/1,273
my/257
měrynjeznaś/1,271
nachylu/257
nadejź/250
napoj/259
narichtu/1,256
narownu/257
nasp/1,267
natrěś/272
natłoc/264
nic/265
nj/1,242
njeblonděrowanj/1,270
njedokóńcu/1,256
njedowuznaś/272
njedozn/1,267
njegjaga/241
njegóspoz/258
njekołkowanj/1,270
njemroc/258
njenadejź/250
njenadymu/1,256
njenanjeplec/264
njenapněś/272
njeplatśa/241
njepódežrawanj/1,270
njepódrosć/250
njepójź/250
njepókurc/264
njepókšyś/272
njepósp/1,267
njepśedkněž/258
njepśedpołož/264
njepśeinterpretěru/1,256
njepśemlaś/272
njepśepławja/241
njepśeswěśenj/1,270
njepśewóz/264
njepśezn/1,267
njepśiseś/272
njepśiłaz/258
njerozměkc/264
njerozzněś/272
njeryra/241
njerytmizěru/1,256
njeschrapowanj/1,270
njesn/1,267
njespójź/250
njewobcerwjen/1,253
njewobkněž/258
njewobmroc/264
njewobsp/1,267
njewobuz/258
njewokomuźanj/1,270
njewopina/241
njewudelku/1,256
njewukšocen/1,253
njewulěpš/264
njewusc/258
njewusmjaś/272
njewusłomjen/1,253
njewuzn/1,267
njewušykowanj/1,270
njewótkluc/264
njewótnowja/241
njewótpśisegu/1,256
njewótzn/1,267
njewóznamjen/1,253
njezajeś/272
njezajź/250
njezakirc/264
njezamłośenj/1,270
njezasp/1,267
njezasłuž/258
njezebleka/241
njezejź/250
njezlodnju/1,256
njezn/1,267
njezwuslěkowanj/1,270
njezwłoc/264
pasl/1,254
prudl/1,254
prědkweześ/1,271
pódjeś/272
pódmlela/241
pódrosć/250
pójź/250
póklěc/263
pómroc/263
pómrocu/1,256
pórownu/257
póspěš/263
póstajarj/1,273
póstarc/263
pótrjebowanj/1,270
pówóc/1,251
pěś/247
pěśadwaźasć/1,245
pěśatśiźasć/1,245
pěśnasć/1,243
pěśźaseś/1,243
płac/261
pśedkněž/258
pśedmjenj/1,269
pśedwustaś/1,271
pśedznamjen/1,253
pśedznamjenj/1,269
pśepšos/264
pśesp/1,267
pśetoc/263
pśełojś/272
pśimjela/241
pśimjen/1,253
pśirostowanj/1,270
pśirěc/263
pśistarc/263
pśiznamjenj/1,269
pśiłaz/258
ramjenj/1,269
repetěru/1,256
rozproj/259
roztoc/263
rozzn/1,267
rubl/1,255
rybowłojś/1,271
satirikarj/1,273
sedymadwaźasć/1,245
sedymasedymźaseś/1,243
sedymnasć/1,243
sedymźaseś/1,243
skoku/257
slědkdaś/1,271
smasl/1,254
sp/1,267
spokoj/259
spójź/250
spósćełanj/1,270
stawjenj/1,269
stereonagraś/1,271
styriadwaźasć/1,245
styrnasć/1,243
styrźasć/1,245
styska/241
swin/1,266
traś/272
trempl/1,254
tś/1,246
tśeńtśl/1,254
tśiadwaźasć/1,245
tśinasć/1,243
tśiźasć/1,245
uv-promjenj/1,269
wingl/1,255
winopiś/1,271
wobcerwjen/1,253
wobgrěš/264
wobgónjowarj/1,273
wobkněž/258
wobmjazu/1,256
wobznamjen/1,253
wochylu/257
wopjeršćen/1,253
wuboc/263
wugronjanj/1,270
wukórjen/1,253
wukšocen/1,253
wulic/263
wumjela/241
wumjen/1,253
wumjenj/1,269
wusc/258
wusp/1,267
wustarc/263
wusłomjen/1,253
wuześ/272
wušropu/1,256
wóc/252
wósuš/263
wósymadwaźasć/1,245
wósymnasć/1,243
wósymźaseś/1,243
wótlic/264
wótstarc/263
wózbóža/241
wóznamjen/1,253
wěrywuznaś/1,271
zacl/1,267
zajź/250
zakśic/263
zapojś/272
zapłomjen/1,253
zaruc/263
zasyp/249
zasćakowanj/1,270
zasłuž/258
zawiźarj/1,273
zašrotu/1,256
zdźarž/264
zejź/250
zlažkagraś/1,271
znamjenj/1,269
zrub/249
zwóstawa/241
zwěru/257
łdž/1,260
Šleswik-Holštejnsk/1,268
šapl/1,254
šesnasć/1,243
šesć/244
šesćadwaźasć/1,245
šesćźaseś/1,243
šybl/1,254
źaseś/244
źe/257
źewjeś/244
źewjeśadwaźasć/1,245
źewjeśnasć/1,243
źewjeśźaseś/1,243
